Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1718
Transactions; authorized purchaser or seller.

(1) Section 8-1717 shall not apply to any transaction offered by and in which any of the following persons, or any employee, officer, or director of such person acting solely in that capacity, is the purchaser or seller:

(a) A person registered with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission as a futures commission merchant or as a leverage transaction merchant whose activities require such registration;

(b) A person registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission as a broker-dealer whose activities require such registration;

(c) A person affiliated with, and whose obligations and liabilities under the transaction are guaranteed by, a person referred to in subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section;

(d) A person who is a member of a contract market designated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission or any clearinghouse thereof;

(e) A financial institution; or

(f) A person registered under the laws of this state as a securities broker-dealer whose activities require such registration.

(2) This section shall not apply to any transaction or activity which is prohibited by the Commodity Exchange Act or CFTC rule.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 18.